Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2125
Investments in subsidiary; disposal; when.

If an insurer ceases to control a subsidiary, it shall dispose of any investment made in the subsidiary pursuant to sections 44-2122 to 44-2124 within three years from the time of the cessation of control or within such further time as the director may prescribe unless, at any time after such investment has been made, such investment has met the requirements for investment under any other provision of Chapter 44 and the insurer has notified the director thereof.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 6.